New York, session 2025-2026, A3587.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6438-d 2 to read as follows: 3 § 6438-d. College admittance for people previously incarcerated. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no person 5 who has previously been incarcerated, shall be denied admittance to any 6 institution of higher education, based solely on such incarceration. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 8 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06136-01-5